Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 8 Railroad Companies

Cross references.

Department of Transportation aid for continuation of rail service for which Interstate Commerce Commission has determined a certificate of abandonment should be issued, §

32-9-6

.

Transportation of freight and passengers by carriers generally, Ch. 9, T. 46.

Creation of Railway Passenger Service Corridor System, Ch. 9A, T. 46.

Official state transportation history museum, §

50-3-77

.

Ownership by state of Western and Atlantic Railroad, §

50-16-100

et seq.